Washington statutes.
RCW 42.08.150

Number of sureties.

Unless otherwise expressly provided, there shall be at least two sureties upon the official bond of every officer.

[ 1890 p 36 s 10; RRS s 9939.]

NOTES:

Corporate sureties: Chapter 48.28 RCW.